Washington statutes.
RCW 11.64.022

Failure to furnish inventory, list liabilities, permit appraisal, etc.—Show cause—Contempt of court—Receiver.

If the surviving partner or partners fail or refuse to furnish an inventory or list of liabilities, to permit an appraisal, or to account to the personal representative, or to furnish a bond when required pursuant to RCW 11.64.016, the court shall order a citation to issue requiring the surviving partner or partners to appear and show cause why they have not furnished an inventory list of liabilities, or permitted an appraisal or why they should not account to the personal representative or file a bond. The citation shall be served not less than ten days before the return day designated therein, or such shorter period as the court upon a showing of good cause deems appropriate. If the surviving partner or partners neglect or refuse to file an inventory or list of liabilities, or to permit an appraisal, or fail to account to the court or to file a bond, after they have been directed to do so, they may be punished for a contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. Where the surviving partner or partners fail to file a bond after being ordered to do so by the court, the court may also appoint a receiver of the partnership estate under chapter 7.60 RCW, and may order the costs and expenses of the proceedings to be paid out of the partnership estate or out of the estate of the decedent, or by the surviving partner or partners personally, or partly by each of the parties.

[ 2004 c 165 s 39; 1989 c 373 s 15; 1977 ex.s. c 234 s 16; 1965 c 145 s 11.64.022. Prior: 1951 c 197 s 4.]

NOTES:

Purpose—Captions not law—2004 c 165: See notes following RCW 7.60.005.

Application, effective date—Severability—1977 ex.s. c 234: See notes following RCW 11.20.020.